New York, session 2025-2026, A1020.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 156-a of the executive law, as 2 added by a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the executive law relat- 3 ing to hazardous materials emergency response training for incidents 4 involving lithium-ion batteries, as proposed in legislative bills 5 numbers S. 8742 and A. 9337, is amended to read as follows: 6 3. Such specialized hazardous materials emergency response training 7 program curriculum shall also include guidance regarding emergency 8 response to incidents involving lithium-ion batteries. For the purposes 9 of this section, "lithium-ion battery" [means a storage battery in which 10 an electrical current is generated by lithium ions embedded in a carbon 11 graphite nickel metal-oxide substrate placed in a high-viscosity carbo- 12 nate mixture or gelled polymer electrolyte] shall have the same meaning 13 as in section four hundred ninety-five of the general business law. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect on the same date and in the same 15 manner as a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the executive law 16 relating to hazardous materials emergency response training for inci- 17 dents involving lithium-ion batteries, as proposed in legislative bills 18 numbers S. 8742 and A. 9337, takes effect. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02664-01-5